Maryland, session 2026, HB0046.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–1E–18.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “GEOFENCE” MEANS A VIRTUAL PERIMETER AROUND A PHYSICAL
LOCATION.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0046*

HOUSE BILL 46
(3) “PILOT PROGRAM” MEANS THE GAMBLING PREVENTION
TECHNOLOGY PILOT PROGRAM.
(B) (1) THERE IS A GAMBLING PREVENTION TECHNOLOGY PILOT
PROGRAM IN THE COMMISSION.
(2) BOWIE STATE UNIVERSITY AND MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
SHALL PARTICIPATE IN THE PILOT PROGRAM.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PILOT PROGRAM IS TO:
(1) IDENTIFY STRATEGIES FOR REDUCING OR MITIGATING THE
NEGATIVE EFFECTS OF PROBLEM GAMBLING BY STUDENTS ON COLLEGE CAMPUSES
IN THE STATE;
(2) COMPILE AND ANALYZE DATA ON THE VIABILITY OF UTILIZING
TECHNOLOGY, INCLUDING GEOFENCING TECHNOLOGY, TO REDUCE PROBLEM
GAMBLING; AND
(3) GAIN INSIGHTS TO IMPROVE ENFORCEMENT OF EXISTING ONLINE
SPORTS WAGERING LAWS IN THE STATE.
(D) THE COMMISSION, IN COLLABORATION WITH BOWIE STATE
UNIVERSITY, MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY, AND THE MARYLAND CENTER OF
EXCELLENCE ON PROBLEM GAMBLING, SHALL:
(1) IDENTIFY LOCATIONS AND BOUNDARIES ON EACH PARTICIPATING
CAMPUS TO BE DESIGNATED AS NO GAMBLING ZONES;
(2) DEVELOP INFORMATIONAL SIGNAGE TO BE POSTED AROUND
EACH ZONE; AND
(3) IDENTIFY AND IMPLEMENT ANY COST–EFFECTIVE TECHNOLOGIES
THAT FURTHER THE GOALS OF THE PILOT PROGRAM, INCLUDING REAL–TIME
MONITORING OF ONLINE SPORTS WAGERING ACTIVITY.
(E) (1) EACH ONLINE SPORTS WAGERING OPERATOR SHALL:
(I) ESTABLISH A GEOFENCE ENCOMPASSING THE DESIGNATED
NO GAMBLING ZONE THAT PREVENTS ACCESS TO THE OPERATOR’S ONLINE SPORTS
WAGERING PLATFORM WITHIN THE BOUNDARY; AND

HOUSE BILL 46 3
(II) COLLABORATE WITH THE COMMISSION TO ENFORCE AND
IMPLEMENT THE RESTRICTION WITHIN THE BOUNDARIES OF THE NO GAMBLING
ZONES.
(2) IF AN INDIVIDUAL ATTEMPTS TO PARTICIPATE IN ONLINE SPORTS
WAGERING WHILE WITHIN THE DESIGNATED GEOFENCE, THE INDIVIDUAL SHALL BE:
(I) PREVENTED FROM ONLINE SPORTS WAGERING; AND
(II) SHOWN A WARNING THAT CONTAINS INFORMATION ON:
1. THE PILOT PROGRAM UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
2. OPTIONS FOR OBTAINING RESPONSIBLE GAMBLING
ASSISTANCE.
(F) THE COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE THE TIME FRAME AND
NECESSARY STEPS TO ESTABLISH THE PILOT PROGRAM.
(G) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT FINE, PENALIZE, OR OTHERWISE SANCTION
AN ONLINE SPORTS WAGERING OPERATOR FOR UNFORESEEABLE TECHNOLOGICAL
FAILURES THAT OCCUR WITHIN THE GEOFENCED BOUNDARIES DURING THE PILOT
PROGRAM.
(H) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2031, THE COMMISSION SHALL SUBMIT A
REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE,
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON ITS FINDINGS FROM THE PILOT PROGRAM,
INCLUDING INFORMATION ON THE EFFECTIVENESS AND VIABILITY OF
IMPLEMENTING GEOFENCING TECHNOLOGY TO LIMIT THE NEGATIVE EFFECTS OF
PROBLEM GAMBLING ON COLLEGE CAMPUSES IN THE STATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of June 30, 2031,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.